Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1905
Department; duties.

The
department shall:

(1) Have the power to deny any grant award, or portion of such award,
made by the board;

(2) Review and monitor expenditures of money from the fund on a periodic
basis; and

(3) Submit to the Governor and the Legislature an annual report of all
receipts and disbursements of funds, including the recipients, the nature
of the program funded, the dollar amount awarded, and the percentage of the
total annually available funds the grant represents. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. The report may be made available to the public
upon request.

Laws 1986, LB 333, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 135;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 46.